Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.060

Lease of buses to transport children with disabilities and elderly—Lease at local level—Criteria.

The lease of the equipment shall be handled by the school directors at a local level. The school directors may establish criteria for bus use and lease, including, but not limited to, minimum costs, and driver requirements.

[ 1971 c 78 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.24.112.]